Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Stay of Execution

Cross references. —

As to stay of execution in justice of the peace courts, see §§

1-21-511

to

1-21-517

.

As to stay of proceedings to enforce a judgment, see Rule 62, W.R.C.P.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

30 Am. Jur. 2d Executions and Enforcement of Judgments §§ 383 to 408.

Stay of execution on ground of absence in military service, 75 ALR2d 1062.

Circumstances in which indefinite stay of proceedings in federal civil case constitutes abuse of discretion or is otherwise unlawful, 150 ALR Fed 577.

33 C.J.S. Executions §§ 139 to 141.

§ 1-17-201.
Right
to stay; procedure.

When judgment has been rendered in any district court against any person for the recovery of money or sale of property he may have a stay of execution as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, except that a supersedeas bond to be furnished in order to stay the execution of any judgment under this section or under W.S.

1-17-210

during the entire course of appellate review shall not, regardless of amount of the judgment, exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) in any action in which all appellants are either individuals or have fifty (50) or fewer employees, or twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000.00) in any other action; provided, however:

That if an appellee proves by a preponderance of the evidence that an appellant is dissipating assets which may affect the ultimate payment of all or any portion of the judgment, the district court, upon motion and hearing, may require the appellant to post a bond in an amount up to the amount of the judgment; or

That an appellee of a judgment to pay taxes or liens to the state of Wyoming shall post a bond in an amount not less than the full amount of the judgment plus interest and costs of the appeal, unless otherwise ordered, as provided in Rule 4.02(b) of the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 122, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3815; C.S. 1910, § 4670; C.S. 1920, § 5943; R.S. 1931, § 89-2903; C.S. 1945, § 3-4101; W.S. 1957, § 1-343; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-201; 2007, ch. 208, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to execution, see Rule 69, W.R.C.P.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added the second clause to (a), and added (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

Substantial evidence. —

Where parties went bail on judgments against elevator company, acknowledgment being endorsed upon execution, and upon being compelled to pay judgment, subsequently brought action against party who was alleged to have agreed to hold plaintiffs harmless on bail, and trial court found for plaintiffs that defendant did promise and agree he would protect them against loss, on substantial conflict of evidence, findings were binding on supreme court. Davison v. Nicholson, 37 Wyo. 412, 263 P. 605,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1928).

Cited

in

Kirch v. Nicholson, 42 Wyo. 489, 297 P. 398,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(1931).

§ 1-17-202.
Notice to sheriff; relinquishment of property.

When the bond is entered after execution is issued, the clerk shall immediately notify the sheriff and he shall forthwith return the execution, noting his actions thereon.

All property levied on before the stay of execution and all written undertakings for the delivery of personal property to the sheriff shall be relinquished by the officer upon bond for the stay of execution being entered.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 122, §§ 3, 3820; R.S. 1899, §§ 6, 3817; C.S. 1910, §§ 4672, 4675; C.S. 1920, §§ 5945, 5948; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-2905, 89-2908; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4103, 3-4106; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-345, 1-348; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-202.

§ 1-17-203.
Effect of recognizance.

Every recognizance of
surety taken as provided shall have the effect of a judgment confessed
from the date taken against the person and property of the surety.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 122, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 3821; C.S. 1910, § 4676; C.S. 1920, § 5949; R.S. 1931, § 89-2909; C.S. 1945, § 3-4107; W.S. 1957, § 1-349; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-203.

Cross references. —

As to judgment by confession, see §§

1-16-201

and

1-16-202

.

Signing of stay bond. —

Where defendant was large stockholder in elevator company, and property of that company was about to be seized and sold by person holding judgment against them and defendant induced plaintiffs to execute stay bond under agreement to protect them, holding harmless and signing of stay bond constituted “confession of judgment” from date thereof under this section, and signing of stay bond constituted valid consideration for promise to hold signers' harmless. Davison v. Nicholson, 37 Wyo. 412, 263 P. 605,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1928).

§ 1-17-204.
Execution at expiration of stay.

At the expiration of
the stay the clerk shall issue a joint execution against the property
of all the judgment debtors and sureties, but the sheriff shall first
levy upon the property of the judgment defendant if sufficient property
can be found. If not found, he shall without delay levy the execution
upon the property of the original judgment debtor subject to the execution
which can be found in the county.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 122, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 3822; C.S. 1910, § 4677; C.S. 1920, § 5950; R.S. 1931, § 89-2910; C.S. 1945, § 3-4108; W.S. 1957, § 1-350; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-204.

Cross references. —

As to rights and remedies of sureties upon payment of judgments, see §

38-1-104

.

§ 1-17-205.
No stay on “not repleviable” judgments.

A stay of execution shall
not be allowed upon any judgment recovered against any person or surety
for money received in a fiduciary capacity or for a breach of any
official duty. The clerk shall issue executions upon the judgments
immediately, returnable in ninety (90) days, endorsed “Not repleviable”
and the judgment shall so order.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 122, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 3823; C.S. 1910, § 4678; C.S. 1920, § 5951; R.S. 1931, § 89-2911; C.S. 1945, § 3-4109; W.S. 1957, § 1-351; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-205.

§ 1-17-206.
No stay where sureties object; exception.

When a court renders
judgment against two (2) or more persons, any of whom are sureties
for another in the contract on which the judgment is founded, there
shall be no stay of execution on the judgment if the sureties object
at the time of rendering the judgment unless the surety for the stay
of execution will undertake specially to pay the judgment in case
the amount cannot be levied of the principal defendant.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 122, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 3824; C.S. 1910, § 4679; C.S. 1920, § 5952; R.S. 1931, § 89-2912; C.S. 1945, § 3-4110; W.S. 1957, § 1-352; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-206.

§ 1-17-207.
Execution upon affidavit of surety; generally.

Any surety for the stay
of execution may file with the clerk an affidavit stating that he
believes he will be liable for the judgment with interest and costs
thereon unless execution issues immediately, and the clerk shall issue
execution immediately unless other sufficient surety is entered before
the clerk or sheriff as in other cases.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 122, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 3825; C.S. 1910, § 4680; C.S. 1920, § 5953; R.S. 1931, § 89-2913; C.S. 1945, § 3-4111; W.S. 1957, § 1-353; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-207.

§ 1-17-208.
Execution upon affidavit of surety; effect of new surety.

If other sufficient surety
is entered, it shall have the force of the original surety entered
before the filing of the affidavit and shall discharge the original
surety.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 122, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 3826; C.S. 1910, § 4681; C.S. 1920, § 5954; R.S. 1931, § 89-2914; C.S. 1945, § 3-4112; W.S. 1957, § 1-354; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-208.

§ 1-17-209.
Time of stay excluded for execution.

The time during which
any judgment is stayed shall not be included in the period during
which the judgment creditor shall cause execution to be issued and
levied in order to preserve his lien on the property of the debtor
as against other judgment creditors.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 122, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 3827; C.S. 1910, § 4682; C.S. 1920, § 5955; R.S. 1931, § 89-2915; C.S. 1945, § 3-4113; W.S. 1957, § 1-355; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-209.

Bankruptcy stay. —

It is apparent that the automatic stay does not operate to stop a creditor from maintaining or continuing the perfection of its security interest during the pendency of a bankruptcy case; however, under Wyoming law, a creditor must execute on its lien within one year of the date the judgment is rendered to maintain its lien. Execution of a judgment is considered a violation of the automatic stay, and, therefore, the court determined that the one-year period is stayed during the period of the automatic stay for execution of a judgment lien.
In re MarMC Transp., Inc., 2012 Bankr. LEXIS 3872 (Bankr. D. Wyo. Aug. 23, 2012).

Cross references. —

As to time of execution to preserve judgment lien, see §

1-17-336

.

§ 1-17-210.
Stay on appeal.

Execution of a judgment
or final order, other than those enumerated in W.S.

1-17-201

, of any judicial tribunal, or the levy or collection
of any tax or assessment therein litigated, may be stayed on such
terms as may be prescribed by the court in which the appeal is filed.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 795; R.S. 1887, § 3143; R.S. 1899, § 4264; C.S. 1910, § 5124; C.S. 1920, § 6386; R.S. 1931, § 89-4818; C.S. 1945, § 3-5317; W.S. 1957, § 1-356; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-210.

Granting of supersedeas. —

After acquiring jurisdiction, supreme court may grant supersedeas. Farmers' State Bank v. Haun, 29 Wyo. 322, 213 P. 361,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1923).

Cited

in

Laughlin v. King, 22 Wyo. 8, 133 P. 1073,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1913).